Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2705.02
Direct payment permit; rights and duties of holder.

The holder of a direct payment permit shall provide a copy of the permit to each retailer who sells, leases, or rents to the permitholder. The retailer shall not collect sales and use taxes on any future sales, leases, or rentals to the permitholder until notified that the permit has been revoked or relinquished. The direct payment permit may not be used for purchases of motor vehicles. The permitholder shall pay all sales and use taxes even on sales for which a refund could be obtained.

Laws 1997, LB 182A, § 5.